New York, session 2025-2026, A11597.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 4 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 2 467 of the real property tax law, as added by chapter 581 of the laws of 3 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (4) Notwithstanding the maximum exemption percentage permitted pursu- 5 ant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, any local law, ordinance or 6 resolution adopted pursuant to this section may be amended, or a local 7 law, ordinance or resolution may be adopted, to create additional annual 8 income categories and corresponding exemption percentages for households 9 making less than the maximum income eligibility level of such municipal 10 corporation as provided in this subdivision (represented in the herein- 11 below schedule as M) pursuant to the following schedule: 12 ANNUAL INCOME PERCENTAGE OF ASSESSED VALUATION 13 EXEMPT FROM TAXATION 14 Less than (M) but 15 more than [(M- $1,000)] (M- $1,001) 50% 16 Less than (M- $1,000) but 17 more than [(M- $2,000)] (M- $2,001) 55% 18 Less than (M- $2,000) but 60% 19 more than [(M- $3,000)] (M- $3001); and 20 Less than (M- $3,000) 65% 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 22 years beginning on and after January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15918-02-6